Utah statutes.
35A-3-311.   Cash assistance to noncitizen legal residents and drug
dependent persons.
(1)  The division may provide cash assistance to a legal resident who is not a
citizen of the United States using funds appropriated from the general fund if
barred under federal law from using federal funds.
(2) (a)  The State exercises the opt out provision in Section 115 of the
Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, Pub.
L. No. 104-193.
(b)  Consistent with Subsection (2)(a), the division may provide cash
assistance and food stamps to a person who has been convicted of a felony
involving a controlled substance, as defined in Section 58-37-2.
(c)  As a condition for receiving cash assistance under this part, a drug
dependant person, as defined in Section 58-37-2, shall:
(i)  receive available treatment for the dependency; and
(ii)  make progress toward overcoming the dependency.
(d)  The department may only refer a client who is a drug dependent person to
a treatment provider that has achieved an objective level of success, as
defined by department rule, in treating drug dependency.
